Hawaii, session 2026, HB2025.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The Hawaii Revised Statutes is amended by adding a new chapter to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "Chapter Digital navigation applications §   -1  Definitions.  As used in this chapter: "Digital navigation application" means a software application using the Global Positioning System, digital maps, and routing algorithms to provide real-time, turn-by-turn guidance for users to find locations and optimize routes, and may include features like traffic updates and estimated time of arrival. "Law enforcement agency" means the sheriff's office or a county police department. "Law enforcement operation" means the set of activities by law enforcement agencies to enforce laws, prevent crime, investigate offenses, and maintain public order. §   -2  Prohibited indication of law enforcement location.  (a)  No digital navigation application shall provide an alert, indication, or other type of notice to users of the presence of law enforcement personnel or a law enforcement operation at any specific location. (b)  Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a digital navigation application from alerting, indicating, or otherwise notifying users of an obstruction to traffic so long as there is no alert, indication, or other type of notice to users of the presence of law enforcement personnel or law enforcement operation at the location of the obstruction. (c)  Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the identification of law enforcement facilities, including police stations, on the digital navigation application's map. §   -3  Injunction; penalty.  (a)  The attorney general or a county attorney may apply to the circuit court in the county in which a violation of section    -2 occurs for relief, and the court may issue a temporary injunction or a permanent injunction to restrain violations of section    -2. (b)  Any digital navigation application violating an injunctive order to cease and desist from violating section -2 shall be fined by a sum of no more than $          , which sum shall be collected in a civil action brought by the attorney general or a county attorney.  Each separate violation of any such order shall be a separate offense, except that in the case of a violation through continuing failure or neglect to obey a final order of the court, each day of continuance of such failure shall constitute a separate offense." SECTION 2.  This Act shall take effect on October 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________